Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.080

Development of procedures on right of entry to facilities—Access to residents—Preservation of rights.

(1) The office of the state long-term care ombuds shall develop procedures governing the right of entry of all long-term care ombuds to long-term care facilities and shall have access to residents with provisions made for privacy for the purpose of hearing, investigating, and resolving complaints of, and rendering advice to, individuals who are patients or residents of the facilities at any time deemed necessary and reasonable by the state ombuds to effectively carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Nothing in this chapter restricts, limits, or increases any existing right of any organizations or individuals not described in subsection (1) of this section to enter or provide assistance to patients or residents of long-term care facilities.

(3) Nothing in this chapter restricts any right or privilege of any patient or resident of a long-term care facility to receive visitors of his or her choice.

[ 2013 c 23 s 95; 1983 c 290 s 8.]